Utah statutes.
55-5-8.   Food service in exempt buildings.

With respect to all state, county, and municipal buildings which are not subject to Section 55-5-7, the governmental agency in charge of the building shall consider allowing the Division of Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired to operate any existing or proposed food service in the building, and shall discuss the operation with the division under Section 53A-24-304 upon its request.



Amended by Chapter 37, 1996 General Session

